Maine, session 132, LD931.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §1606, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 169, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Sentence prorated. Inmates participating in a public works-related project or an
improvement of property owned by a charitable organization under subsection 1 and
inmates participating in a work project within a jail under subsection 1-B may have their
sentences to the jail prorated at the rate of up to one day removed from the sentences for
every 16 hours of participation in the project, except that inmates committed to the custody
of the sheriff for nonpayment of fines under Title 17‑A, section 1711 must have their
sentences prorated at the rate that is applicable to the individual inmate pursuant to Title
17‑A, section 1711, subsection 4, paragraph A, subparagraph (1).
Page 1 - 132LR1245(03)